Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1855YH (2) 91 je/js H.F. 432 Section 1. Section 84E.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. An apprenticeship sponsor or lead apprenticeship 3 sponsor that conducts an apprenticeship program that is 4 registered with the United States department of labor, office 5 of apprenticeship, through Iowa, for apprentices who will be 6 employed at worksites located in this state may apply to the 7 department for financial assistance under this section if the 8 apprenticeship program includes a minimum of seventy-five 9 contact hours per apprentice for the first training year of 10 an apprenticeship program and one hundred contact hours per 11 apprentice for each full training year of the apprenticeship 12 program thereafter . 13